Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.427

City constructing generating facility in other county—Additional findings—Renegotiation.

The findings provided for in RCW 35.21.426 may also provide for varying payments based on formulas to be stated in the findings, and for varying payments for different stated periods. The findings shall also state a future time at which the agreement shall be renegotiated or, in event of failure to agree on such renegotiation, be arbitrated as provided in RCW 35.21.426.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.427. Prior: 1955 c 252 s 3.]